Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2508
Use of public vehicles authorized.

Motor vehicles owned or operated by any state or local agency may be used in ride-sharing arrangements for public employees. Participants in any such ride-sharing arrangement shall pay the actual total costs of using the vehicle in that arrangement.

Laws 1981, LB 50, § 8.